New York, session 2025-2026, A1773.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (g) of paragraph 1 of subdivision g of section 2 26-405 of the administrative code of the city of New York, as amended by 3 section 27 of part Q of chapter 39 of the laws of 2019, is amended to 4 read as follows: 5 (g) There has been since July first, nineteen hundred seventy, a major 6 capital improvement essential for the preservation energy efficiency, 7 functionality, or infrastructure of the entire building, improvement of 8 the structure including heating, windows, plumbing and roofing but shall 9 not be for operational costs or unnecessary cosmetic improvements. The 10 temporary increase based upon a major capital improvement under this 11 subparagraph for any order of the commissioner issued after the effec- 12 tive date of the chapter of the laws of two thousand nineteen that 13 amended this subparagraph shall be in an amount sufficient to amortize 14 the cost of the improvements pursuant to this subparagraph [(g)] over a 15 twelve-year period for buildings with thirty-five or fewer units or a 16 twelve and one-half year period for buildings with more than thirty-five 17 units, and shall be removed from the legal regulated rent thirty years 18 from the date the increase became effective inclusive of any increases 19 granted by the applicable rent guidelines board. Temporary major capital 20 improvement increases shall be collectible prospectively on the first 21 day of the first month beginning sixty days from the date of mailing 22 notice of approval to the tenant. Such notice shall disclose the total 23 monthly increase in rent and the first month in which the tenant would 24 be required to pay the temporary increase. An approval for a temporary 25 major capital improvement increase shall not include retroactive EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04635-01-5 A. 1773 2 1 payments. The collection of any increase shall not exceed two percent in 2 any year from the effective date of the order granting the increase over 3 the rent set forth in the schedule of gross rents, with collectability 4 of any dollar excess above said sum to be spread forward in similar 5 increments and added to the rent as established or set in future years. 6 Upon vacancy, the landlord may add any remaining balance of the tempo- 7 rary major capital improvement increase to the legal regulated rent. A 8 rent adjustment for a major capital improvement may only be granted if 9 the owner or agent of the subject building first applies for and 10 receives benefits pursuant to section 11-243 of this code for the build- 11 ing for which they are seeking a major capital improvement for, 12 provided, however, an owner or agent of the subject building that is 13 denied benefits pursuant to section 11-243 of this code for reasons 14 unrelated to an untimely or improperly completed application shall still 15 be eligible to receive a rent adjustment for a major capital improve- 16 ment. Notwithstanding any other provision of the law, for any renewal 17 lease commencing on or after June 14, 2019, the collection of any rent 18 increases due to any major capital improvements approved on or after 19 June 16, 2012 and before June 16, 2019 shall not exceed two percent in 20 any year for any tenant in occupancy on the date the major capital 21 improvement was approved[,]; or 22 § 2. Paragraph 6 of subdivision c of section 26-511 of the administra- 23 tive code of the city of New York, as separately amended by section 12 24 of part K of chapter 36 and section 28 of part Q of chapter 39 of the 25 laws of 2019, is amended to read as follows: 26 (6) provides criteria whereby the commissioner may act upon applica- 27 tions by owners for increases in excess of the level of fair rent 28 increase established under this law provided, however, that such crite- 29 ria shall provide (a) as to hardship applications, for a finding that 30 the level of fair rent increase is not sufficient to enable the owner to 31 maintain approximately the same average annual net income (which shall 32 be computed without regard to debt service, financing costs or manage- 33 ment fees) for the three year period ending on or within six months of 34 the date of an application pursuant to such criteria as compared with 35 annual net income, which prevailed on the average over the period nine- 36 teen hundred sixty-eight through nineteen hundred seventy, or for the 37 first three years of operation if the building was completed since nine- 38 teen hundred sixty-eight or for the first three fiscal years after a 39 transfer of title to a new owner provided the new owner can establish to 40 the satisfaction of the commissioner that [he or she] such new owner 41 acquired title to the building as a result of a bona fide sale of the 42 entire building and that the new owner is unable to obtain requisite 43 records for the fiscal years nineteen hundred sixty-eight through nine- 44 teen hundred seventy despite diligent efforts to obtain same from prede- 45 cessors in title and further provided that the new owner can provide 46 financial data covering a minimum of six years under [his or her] their 47 continuous and uninterrupted operation of the building to meet the three 48 year to three year comparative test periods herein provided; and (b) as 49 to completed building-wide major capital improvements, for a finding 50 that such improvements are deemed depreciable under the Internal Revenue 51 Code and that the cost is to be amortized over a twelve-year period for 52 a building with thirty-five or fewer housing accommodations, or a twelve 53 and one-half-year period for a building with more than thirty-five hous- 54 ing accommodations, for any determination issued by the division of 55 housing and community renewal after the effective date of [the] the 56 chapter of the laws of two thousand nineteen that amended this paragraph A. 1773 3 1 and shall be removed from the legal regulated rent thirty years from the 2 date the increase became effective inclusive of any increases granted by 3 the applicable rent guidelines board. Temporary major capital improve- 4 ment increases shall be collectible prospectively on the first day of 5 the first month beginning sixty days from the date of mailing notice of 6 approval to the tenant. Such notice shall disclose the total monthly 7 increase in rent and the first month in which the tenant would be 8 required to pay the temporary increase. An approval for a temporary 9 major capital improvement increase shall not include retroactive 10 payments. The collection of any increase shall not exceed two percent in 11 any year from the effective date of the order granting the increase over 12 the rent set forth in the schedule of gross rents, with collectability 13 of any dollar excess above said sum to be spread forward in similar 14 increments and added to the rent as established or set in future years. 15 Upon vacancy, the landlord may add any remaining balance of the tempo- 16 rary major capital improvement increase to the legal regulated rent. 17 Notwithstanding any other provision of the law, for any renewal lease 18 commencing on or after June 14, 2019, the collection of any rent 19 increases due to any major capital improvements approved on or after 20 June 16, 2012 and before June 16, 2019 shall not exceed two percent in 21 any year for any tenant in occupancy on the date the major capital 22 improvement was approved or based upon cash purchase price exclusive of 23 interest or service charges. Where an application for a temporary major 24 capital improvement increase has been filed, a tenant shall have sixty 25 days from the date of mailing of a notice of a proceeding in which to 26 answer or reply. The state division of housing and community renewal 27 shall provide any responding tenant with the reasons for the division's 28 approval or denial of such application. A rent adjustment for a major 29 capital improvement may only be granted if the owner or agent of the 30 subject building first applies for and receives benefits pursuant to 31 section 11-243 of this code for the building for which they are seeking 32 a major capital improvement for, provided, however, an owner or agent of 33 the subject building that is denied benefits pursuant to section 11-243 34 of this code for reasons unrelated to an untimely or improperly 35 completed application shall still be eligible to receive a rent adjust- 36 ment for a major capital improvement. Notwithstanding anything to the 37 contrary contained herein, no hardship increase granted pursuant to this 38 paragraph shall, when added to the annual gross rents, as determined by 39 the commissioner, exceed the sum of, (i) the annual operating expenses, 40 (ii) an allowance for management services as determined by the commis- 41 sioner, (iii) actual annual mortgage debt service (interest and amorti- 42 zation) on its indebtedness to a lending institution, an insurance 43 company, a retirement fund or welfare fund which is operated under the 44 supervision of the banking or insurance laws of the state of New York or 45 the United States, and (iv) eight and one-half percent of that portion 46 of the fair market value of the property which exceeds the unpaid prin- 47 cipal amount of the mortgage indebtedness referred to in subparagraph 48 (iii) of this paragraph. Fair market value for the purposes of this 49 paragraph shall be six times the annual gross rent. The collection of 50 any increase in the stabilized rent for any apartment pursuant to this 51 paragraph shall not exceed six percent in any year from the effective 52 date of the order granting the increase over the rent set forth in the 53 schedule of gross rents, with collectability of any dollar excess above 54 said sum to be spread forward in similar increments and added to the 55 stabilized rent as established or set in future years; A. 1773 4 1 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately, provided, however that 2 the amendments to section 26-405 of the city rent and rehabilitation law 3 made by section one of this act shall remain in full force and effect 4 only so long as the public emergency requiring the regulation and 5 control of residential rents and evictions continues, as provided in 6 subdivision 3 of section 1 of the local emergency housing rent control 7 act; and provided, further, that the amendments to section 26-511 of the 8 rent stabilization law of nineteen hundred sixty-nine made by section 9 two of this act shall expire on the same date as such law expires and 10 shall not affect the expiration of such law as provided under section 11 26-520 of such law, as from time to time amended; and provided, further, 12 that the provisions of sections one and two of this act shall only apply 13 to those buildings that commence work on a major capital improvement 45 14 days or later than the effective date of this act.